Connecticut, session 2026, HB05376.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 8-30g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is amended by adding subsection (n) as follows (Effective October 1,
2026):
(NEW) (n) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (g) of this
section, a commission may deny or return as incomplete any affordable
housing application that utilizes nonstandard, prefabricated or
proprietary construction assemblies if the applicant fails to provide a
preliminary life safety report. Such report shall be prepared by a
licensed professional engineer or fire protection engineer and shall
certify that the proposed design, including means of egress and fire-
rated separations, is capable of compliance with the State Building Code
and State Fire Safety Code without requiring a modification to the
proposed design. The commission may require a third-party peer
review of said report at the applicant's expense.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 8-30g(n)
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5376
INS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2